Utah statutes.
9-10-107.   Division to distribute money -- Annual report -- Administration
costs.
(1) The division shall distribute loan and grant money if the loan or grant is
approved by the board.
(2)  The division shall make an annual report concerning the number and type
of loans and grants made as well as a list of recipients of this assistance
to:
(a)  the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee, created in Section
36-22-1; and
(b)  the governor.
(3)  The division, with board approval, may use fund money for the
administration of the fund, but this amount may not exceed 2% of the annual
receipts to the fund.
